Hawaii statutes.
§184-6 Duties of department. The
department of land and natural resources shall preserve the parks and parkways
in the state park system in their natural condition so far as may be consistent
with their use and safety, and improve them in such manner as to retain to a
maximum extent their natural scenic, historic, and wildlife values for the use
and enjoyment of the public. [L 1949, c 185, pt of §1; RL 1955, §19-37; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §184-6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next